Hawaii statutes.
§514E-9 Disclosure statement. (a) Any
offering of a time sharing plan to the public shall disclose:

(1) The name and address of the developer and of the
time share units;

(2) The name and address of the plan manager, if any,
and a description of the plan manager's responsibilities and authority;

(3) A description of the time share units, including
the developer's schedule for completion of all buildings, units, and amenities
and dates of availability;

(4) If the time share plan is located in a condominium
property regime, a description of the project and any pertinent provisions of
the project instruments;

(5) Any restraints on the transfer of the buyer's
time share interest in the time share units or plan;

(6) Whether the time share plan is a time share
ownership plan or a time share use plan, along with a description of the rights
and responsibilities under said plan;

(7) A statement that there is a seven-calendar-day
period of mutual rescission;

(8) A statement that pursuant to section 514E-11.3,
every sale or transfer, made in violation of this chapter is voidable at the
election of the purchaser;

(9) Notice of any liens, title defects or
encumbrances on or affecting the title to the units or plan;

(10) Notice of any pending or anticipated suits that
are material to the time share units or plan, of which the developer has, or
should have, knowledge;

(11) The total financial obligation of the purchaser,
which shall consist of:

(A) A statement that the purchaser is
obligated to pay the initial price stated in the purchaser's purchase
agreement; and

(B) A list or description of any additional
charges to which the purchaser may be subject;

(12) An estimate of the dues, maintenance fees, real
property taxes, and similar periodic expenses, and the method or formula by
which they are derived and apportioned;

(13) The disclosure statement under subsection (d), if
applicable; and

(14) Other disclosures required by the director, as
provided by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) The requirements of this section shall not
apply to the following transactions:

(1) Any transaction pursuant to order of any court;

(2) Any disposition by a government or governmental
agency;

(3) Normal hotel operations; or

(4) Any gratuitous transfer.

(c) A developer or sales agent shall promptly
amend or supplement the disclosure statement to report any material change in
the information required by this section.

(d) If all the time share units are located
outside the State, the disclosure statement shall contain the following
statement:

"BECAUSE THE TIME SHARE UNITS OF THIS TIME
SHARE PLAN ARE LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE OF HAWAII, THE PLAN MANAGER IS EXEMPT
FROM REGISTRATION UNDER HAWAII'S TIME SHARE LAW, AND HAWAII'S TIME SHARE LAW
PROVIDES NO PROTECTIONS TO PURCHASERS WITH RESPECT TO THE PLAN MANAGER."

[L 1980, c 186, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 81, §4;
am L 1985, c 114, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 65, §2; am L 2013, c 49, §1; am
L 2014, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next